apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="oli/e__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ën</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ëns</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es'</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="crash__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es'</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lera/ar__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ren</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rens</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars'</l>      <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="glan/s__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sens</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zen</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zens</l>      <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="oli/e__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e's</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ën</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ëns</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es'</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sne/er__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rens</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers'</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="wit/brood__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>brood</l>     <r>brood<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>broods</l>    <r>brood<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tebroden</l>  <r>brood<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tebrodens</l> <r>brood<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="schout/-bij-nacht__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>-bij-nacht</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-bij-nachts</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en-bij-nacht</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en-bij-nachts</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-bij-nachts</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-bij-nachts'</l><r>-bij-nacht<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="esdo/orn__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>orn</l>       <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orns</l>      <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orns</l>      <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orns'</l>     <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens'</l>     <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="molecu/ul__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ul</l>        <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uls</l>       <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lens</l>      <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="molecu/ul__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ul</l>        <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uls</l>       <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lens</l>      <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tram__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pad__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ader__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="65+-kaart__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<!-- SECTION: ADVERBS -->

<e lm="65+-kaart">       <i>65+-kaart</i><par n="65+-kaart__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="Utrechtenaar">    <i>Utrechtena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="ablutie">         <i>abluti</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="ambtenaar">       <i>ambtena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="beuzelaar">       <i>beuzela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="blaasbalgberoker"><i>blaasbalgberoker</i><par n="crash__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="bypass">          <i>bypass</i><par n="crash__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="ceremonie">       <i>ceremoni</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="crash">           <i>crash</i><par n="crash__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="eigenaar">        <i>eigena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="mede-eigenaar">   <i>mede-eigena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="elektrode">       <i>elektrode</i><par n="ader__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="esdoorn">         <i>esdo</i><par n="esdo/orn__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="geweldenaar">     <i>geweldena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="gijzelaar">       <i>gijzela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="glans">           <i>glan</i><par n="glan/s__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="helikoptercrash"> <i>helikoptercrash</i><par n="crash__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="hoogleraar">      <i>hooglera</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="hostie">          <i>hosti</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="huichelaar">      <i>huichela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="huiseigenaar">    <i>huiseigena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="iezegrim">        <i>iezegrim</i><par n="tram__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="kandelaar">       <i>kandela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="kerselaar">       <i>kersela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="kluizenaar">      <i>kluizena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="kolonie">         <i>koloni</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="lepelaar">        <i>lepela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="leraar">          <i>lera</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="letter">          <i>letter</i><par n="ader__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="malversatie">     <i>malversati</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="martelaar">       <i>martela</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="minnaar">         <i>minna</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="missie">          <i>missi</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="moet">            <i>moet</i><par n="ader__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="molecuul">        <i>molecu</i><par n="molecu/ul__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="molecuul">        <i>molecu</i><par n="molecu/ul__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="ooievaar">        <i>ooieva</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="pad">             <i>pad</i><par n="pad__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="porie">           <i>pori</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="provincie">       <i>provinci</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="religie">         <i>religi</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="schalie">         <i>schali</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="schildpad">       <i>schildpad</i><par n="pad__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="schout-bij-nacht"><i>schout</i><par n="schout/-bij-nacht__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="sectie">          <i>secti</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="situatie">        <i>situati</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="skileraar">       <i>skilera</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="sneer">           <i>sne</i><par n="sne/er__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="tovenaar">        <i>tovena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="tralie">          <i>trali</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="tram">            <i>tram</i><par n="tram__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="witbrood">        <i>wit</i><par n="wit/brood__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="zaaleigenaar">    <i>zaaleigena</i><par n="lera/ar__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="zeeassurantie">   <i>zeeassuranti</i><par n="oli/e__n_f"/></e>
